Utah statutes.
63A-2-101.5.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Division" means the Division of Purchasing and General Services created under Section 63A-2-101.

(2)  "Information technology equipment" means equipment that is designed to electronically manipulate, store, or transfer a form of data.

(3)  "Inventory property" means property in the possession of the division that is available for purchase by an agency or the public.

(4)  "Judicial district" means a geographic district established by Section 78A-1-102.

(5)  "Person with a disability" means a person with a severe, chronic disability that:

(a)  is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or a combination of mental and physical impairments; and

(b)  is likely to continue indefinitely.

(6)  "Personal handheld electronic device":

(a)  means an electronic device that is designed for handheld use and permits the user to store or access information, the primary value of which is specific to the user of the device; and

(b)  includes a mobile phone, pocket personal computer, personal digital assistant, or similar device.

(7)  "Property act" means the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, 40 U.S.C. Sec. 549.

(8) (a)  "Surplus property" means property that an agency:

(i)  intends for disposal; and

(ii)  has acquired by purchase, seizure, or donation.

(b)  "Surplus property" does not include:

(i)   real property; or

(ii)  an aluminum can or an item made primarily of paper, plastic, or card board that is:

(A)  discarded; and

(B)  recyclable.

(9)  "Transfer" means transfer of surplus property without cash consideration except for a fee described in Subsection 63A-2-401(3)(c).

